Utah statutes.
72-10-604.   Written notice to ground transportation service provider whose access to airport is denied or terminated -- Right to respond and seek review.

(1)  If a city denies or terminates the right of a ground transportation service provider to provide ground transportation service to an airport because of information obtained through a criminal background check under this part, the city shall:

(a)  notify the ground transportation service provider in writing of the reasons for the denial or termination; and

(b)  give the ground transportation service provider an opportunity to respond to the reasons and to seek review of the denial or termination through administrative procedures established by the city.

(2)  If a ground transportation service provider is denied access to provide ground transportation service to an airport, the denial shall not impact the right of another ground transportation service provider who provides ground transportation service for the same business.



Enacted by Chapter 137, 2006 General Session

